Washington statutes.
RCW 43.46.085

Poet laureate account.

The poet laureate account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may only be used for the poet laureate program. Only the executive director of the commission or the executive director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2007 c 128 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—2007 c 128: See note following RCW 43.46.081.